Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2507
Municipality, defined.

Municipality means all cities and villages, not operating under home rule charters, including those functioning under the commission and city manager plans of government.

Laws 1982, LB 807, § 7;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 9;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 170.